Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-311
Officers; qualifications.

All elected officers of a city of the first class shall be registered voters of the city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 18, p. 234;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 108;

R.S.1913, § 4877;

Laws 1917, c. 95, § 1, p. 254;

C.S.1922, § 4045;

C.S.1929, § 16-307;

Laws 1931, c. 31, § 1, p. 122;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-307;

R.S.1943, § 16-311;

Laws 1969, c. 76, § 1, p. 405;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 488.